Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.090

Expense of proceedings.

The cost and expense of the road, together with cost of proceedings thereon and of right-of-way and any quarries or other land acquired therefor, and the maintenance of the road shall be paid out of the county road fund. When the costs are assessed against the principals on the bond given in connection with a petition for the improvement, the county auditor shall file a cost bill with the county treasurer who shall proceed to collect it.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.81.090. Prior: (i) 1937 c 187 s 22, part; RRS s 6450-22, part. (ii) 1937 c 187 s 20, part; RRS s 6450-20, part.]